Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.907

Construction—Pending actions as of January 1, 1988.

Notwithstanding the repeals of prior laws, actions which were properly and validly pending in the superior courts of this state as of January 1, 1988, shall not be governed by chapter 460, Laws of 1987 but shall be governed by the provisions of law in effect on December 31, 1987.

[ 1989 c 375 s 17; 1987 c 460 s 23.]